Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.76.020

Boundary information.

The legislative authority of each county and each city, town, and special purpose district which lies within the county shall provide the county auditor accurate information describing its geographical boundaries and the boundaries of its director, council, or commissioner districts and shall ensure that the information provided to the auditor is kept current.

[ 2013 c 11 s 77; 2003 c 111 s 1902. Prior: 1991 c 178 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.15.026, 29.04.220.]